Vermont, session 2025-2026, H823.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. chapter 63, subchapter 1F is added to read:
Subchapter 1F. Social Media Warning Labels
§ 2470oo. WARNING LABELS AND NOTIFICATIONS
(a) Requirements. A person shall include a mental health warning label on
a social media platform it operates that:
(1) follows the guidelines developed by the Attorney General pursuant
to subsection (b) of this section;
VT LEG #386321 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.823
2026 Page 2 of 5
(2) appears in a size that is easily readable by the average user each time
a user accesses the platform;
(3) warns a user of potential negative mental health impacts of accessing
the platform;
(4) provides the user with access to resources to address the potential
negative mental health impacts of social media and includes the website and
telephone number of a national suicide prevention and mental health crisis
hotline system, including the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline; and
(5) only disappears when the user:
(A) exits the platform; or
(B) acknowledges the potential for harm and chooses to hide or
minimize the label.
(b) Guidelines. The Attorney General, in consultation with the
Commissioner of Health, shall develop guidelines for the mental health
warning label to be used by social media platforms in order to conform with
the requirements of this section. The guidelines shall be based on current
evidence regarding the negative mental health impacts of social media
platforms. The Attorney General shall review and revise the guidelines as
appropriate.
(c) Prohibitions. As it pertains to a warning label required by this section, a
social media platform shall not:
VT LEG #386321 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.823
2026 Page 3 of 5
(1) provide the warning label exclusively in the social media platform’s
terms and conditions;
(2) include extraneous information in the warning label that obscures the
visibility or prominence of the warning label; or
(3) allow a user to disable the warning label, except as provided under
subdivision (a)(5) of this section.
(d) Time used on platform.
(1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, a social
media platform shall display a conspicuous pop-up notification not less than
once every 30 minutes for a user who is actively using the platform. The
notification shall:
(A) inform the user:
(i) that the user has actively used the platform for the relevant
consecutive period of time; and
(ii) of the total time the user has actively used the platform that
calendar day; and
(B) only disappear upon the user closing the notification.
(2) A social media platform may allow a user to customize the period of
time resulting in the notification, provided that the maximum time period shall
not exceed 60 minutes.
(e) Enforcement and rulemaking.
VT LEG #386321 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.823
2026 Page 4 of 5
(1) A person that violates this section or rules adopted pursuant to this
section commits an unfair and deceptive act in commerce in violation of
section 2453 of this chapter.
(2) The Attorney General shall have the same authority under this
section to make rules, conduct civil investigations, bring civil actions, and
enter into assurances of discontinuance as provided in this chapter.
(f) Definitions. As used in this section, “social media platform” means a
website, mobile application, or internet medium that:
(1) permits a person to become a registered user, establish an account, or
create a profile for the purpose of allowing users to create, share, and view
user-generated content through such an account or profile;
(2) enables one or more users to generate content that can be viewed by
other users of the medium; and
(3) primarily serves as a medium for users to interact with content
generated by other users of the medium.
Sec. 2. SOCIAL MEDIA WARNING LABEL GUIDELINES
The Attorney General shall publish the guidelines for social media warning
labels pursuant to 9 V.S.A. § 2470oo(b) on or before April 1, 2027.
VT LEG #386321 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.823
2026 Page 5 of 5
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2027, except that this section (effective
dates) and Sec. 2 (social media warning label guidelines) shall take effect on
July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386321 v.1